Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-58] Operating support. (a)
Without regard to chapter 42F, the private entity or its nonprofit management
entity to which one or more of the facilities of the Maui regional system has
been transferred pursuant to this part may seek funds from the State for its
operating costs, as defined in section 37-62, of a transferred facility by
preparing a budgetary request in accordance with procedures and criteria
established by the director of finance. In no event shall the amount requested
exceed the amount appropriated for the operating costs of the Maui regional
system for the 2014 fiscal year. The director of finance shall review the
request and may include some or all of the amount requested in the executive
budget of the department of health. Any appropriation made in response to the
request shall be subject to the allotment system generally applicable to all
appropriations made by the legislature. The department of health shall be
responsible for transferring the funds allotted to the private entity or its
nonprofit management entity for expenditure.

(b) To qualify to request funds from the State
under this section, the private entity or its nonprofit management entity to
which one or more of the facilities of the Maui regional system has been transferred
pursuant to this part shall satisfy the following standards and conditions:

(1) Be duly authorized to transact business in the
State, and determined and designated to be a nonprofit organization by the
Internal Revenue Service;

(2) Be licensed and accredited, in accordance with
federal, state, or county statutes, rules, or ordinances, to conduct the
activities for which funding is sought;

(3) Have a governing board whose members have no
material conflict of interest and serve without compensation;

(4) Have bylaws or policies that describe the manner
in which business is conducted, prohibit nepotism, and provide for the
management of potential conflict of interest situations;

(5) Be in compliance with all of the requirements of
chapter 323D with respect to the transferred facility and any other health care
facility it operates;

(6) Submit tax clearances from the director of
taxation and the Internal Revenue Service to the effect that all tax returns
due have been filed and all taxes, interest, and penalties levied or accrued
against have been paid;

(7) Submit to an annual audit, disclose revenue
projections, and prepare an annual internal performance audit and itemized
financial statements, including reimbursement rates, with respect to the transferred
facility, to the extent practicable, in the same manner as described in section
323F-22; and

(8) Submit its annual budget with respect to a
transferred facility to the legislature for review at least twenty days prior
to the convening of the regular legislative session. [L 2015, c 103, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next